src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON CIEZAGAVCCATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža#gávccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža#gávccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža#gávccát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:eža#gávccát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:eža#gávccát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:eža#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:eža#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:eža%>jn#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:eža%>n#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:eža#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:eža#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:eža#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža#gávccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:eža#gávccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža#gávccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža#gávccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#gávccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža#gávccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža#gávccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:eža%>t#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:eža%>jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:eža%>jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:eža%>jn#gávccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#gávccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#gávccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>t#gávccát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON CIEZAOVCCATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža#ovccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža#ovccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža#ovccát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:eža#ovccát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:eža#ovccát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:eža#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:eža#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:eža%>jn#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:eža%>n#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:eža#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:eža#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:eža#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža#ovccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:eža#ovccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža#ovccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža#ovccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža#ovccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:eža%>t#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:eža%>jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:eža%>jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:eža%>jn#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>t#ovccát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON CIEZALOGATLOHKAI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža#logát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža#logát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža#logát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:eža#logát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:eža#logát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:eža#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:eža#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:eža%>jn#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:eža%>n#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:eža#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:eža#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:eža#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža#logát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:eža#logát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža#logát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža#logát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža#logát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:eža%>t#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:eža%>jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:eža%>jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:eža%>jn#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>t#logát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON CIEZALOGI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Num+Sg+Nom:ehča#lohki K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:eža#logi K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:ehča#logi K ;
 +Num+Ess:ehča%>n#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:ehča%>n#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:eža#logi K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:eža#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:eža#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:eža#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Err/Orth:eža#logi%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Num+Err/Orth:eža#lot%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:eža#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:eža%>jn#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:eža%>n#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:eža#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:eža#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:eža#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:eža#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:eža#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:eža#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:eža#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:eža%>jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:eža%>jde#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jd9#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:eža%>jgujn#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:eža%>t#lot K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:eža%>jd#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:eža%>jd#lot K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:eža%>jn#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:eža%>t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:eža%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:eža%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:eža%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:eža%>jd#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:eža%>jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Ess:eža%>t#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON GAVCCI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ Case forms of the basic digits
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Use/NG: K ; !
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:»X4 NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X3j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
čiežagávccátlohkái:či CIEZAGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
čiežaovccátlohkái:či CIEZAOVCCATLOHKAI ;
čiežalogátlohkái:či CIEZALOGATLOHKAI ;
giežagávccátlohkái:gi CIEZAGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
giežaovccátlohkái:gi CIEZAOVCCATLOHKAI ;
giežalogátlohkái:gi CIEZALOGATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
čiežagávccátlohkái:či CIEZAGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
čiežaovccátlohkái:či CIEZAOVCCATLOHKAI ;
čiežalogátlohkái:či CIEZALOGATLOHKAI ;
giežagávccátlohkái:gi CIEZAGAVCCATLOHKAI ;
giežaovccátlohkái:gi CIEZAOVCCATLOHKAI ;
giežalogátlohkái:gi CIEZALOGATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON CUODI   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
čuođičiežalogi:čuođi#či CIEZALOGI ;
čuođigiežalogi:čuođi#gi CIEZALOGI ;
oktačuohtičiežalogi:okta#čuohti#či CIEZALOGI ;
oktačuohtigiežalogi:okta#čuohti#gi CIEZALOGI ;
čuohtičiežalogi:čuohti#či CIEZALOGI ;
čuohtigiežalogi:čuohti#gi CIEZALOGI ;
LEXICON num-imprecise   !!≈ * __@CODE@__ Imprecise numbers
beal% gávcci+Err/MissingSpace:beal😱#gák'ci GAVCCI ; !time
beal% ovcci+Err/MissingSpace:beal😱#ok'ci GAVCCI ; !time
beal% gávcci:beal% gák'ci GAVCCI ; !time
beal% ovcci:beal% ok'ci GAVCCI ; !time
